Hawaii statutes.
§414-126 Waiver of notice. (a) A
shareholder may waive any notice required by this chapter, the articles of
incorporation, or bylaws before or after the date and time stated in the
notice. The waiver shall be in writing and be signed by the shareholder
entitled to the notice or shall be by electronic transmission by the
shareholder entitled to notice, and delivered to the corporation for inclusion
in the minutes or filing with the corporate records; provided that the
electronic transmission sets forth, or is delivered with information from which
the corporation may determine that the electronic transmission was transmitted
by the shareholder.

(b) A shareholder's attendance at a meeting:

(1) Waives objection to lack of notice or defective
notice of the meeting, unless the shareholder at the beginning of the meeting
objects to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting; and

(2) Waives objection to consideration of a particular
matter at the meeting that is not within the purpose or purposes described in
the meeting notice, unless the shareholder objects to considering the matter
when it is presented. [L 2000, c 244, pt of §1; am L 2002, c 130, §19]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next